Utah statutes.
57-8a-305.   One-action rule not applicable -- Abandonment of enforcement proceeding.

(1)  Subsection 78B-6-901(1) does not apply to an association's judicial or nonjudicial foreclosure of a lot under this part.

(2)  An association may abandon a judicial foreclosure, nonjudicial foreclosure, or sheriff's sale and initiate a separate action or another judicial foreclosure, nonjudicial foreclosure, or sheriff's sale if the initial judicial foreclosure, nonjudicial foreclosure, or sheriff's sale is not complete.



Enacted by Chapter 355, 2011 General Session

